Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 21 Health and Safety of Pupils
16-21-21.
Student discipline codes.

Each school committee shall make, maintain, and enforce a student discipline code. The purpose of the code is to foster a positive environment that promotes learning. The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide necessary technical assistance in the development of the student discipline code. The school committee shall cause the school discipline code to be distributed to each student enrolled in the district. Each student and his or her parent, guardian, or custodian shall sign a statement verifying that they have been given a copy of the student discipline code of their respective school district.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 61, § 1.

16-21-21.1.
Penalties for drug, alcohol or weapons offenses.

The discipline of any public school student for violating a school policy relating to the possession or use of alcohol, drugs or weapons not described in §

16-21-18

of this chapter, shall be imposed on a case-by-case basis pursuant to guidelines developed and promulgated by the school committee for that district. The guidelines and any discipline imposed shall take into account the nature and circumstances of the violation and the applicability of any federal laws governing students with disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 339, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 407, § 1.

16-21-22.
Allergic emergencies — Anaphylaxis — Use of epinephrine — Immunity for those administering.

The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of health shall incorporate into their policies, rules, and regulations pertaining to school health programs a procedure for addressing incidents of anaphylaxis (exaggerated allergic reaction) in order to provide for the health and safety of children who have been medically identified as being prone to anaphylaxis or who show evidence of anaphylaxis. The policies, rules, and regulations shall include a procedure whereby a parent or legal guardian of any child may expressly authorize the school department and school bus drivers and monitors to administer the epinephrine on his or her child in case of an emergency and ensures that the epinephrine is kept in a conspicuous place, readily available, and that their proper use is made known to school personnel. School bus drivers and monitors shall receive training in the administration of epinephrine. To treat a case of anaphylaxis, trained school bus drivers and/or monitors shall administer the epinephrine auto-injector to an identified student.

The policies, rules, and regulations shall also include a procedure to allow children to carry and use prescription inhalers, and auto-injectable epinephrine, while in school, at a school-sanctioned function or event, or in transit to and from school or school-sanctioned function or event by the school bus service provider; when prescribed by a licensed individual with prescriptive privileges. Children who need to carry prescription inhalers and/or auto-injectable epinephrine shall provide the school and the school bus service provider with medical documentation that the inhaler and/or auto-injectable epinephrine has been legitimately prescribed and that the child needs to carry it on his or her person due to a medical condition, but no child shall be disciplined solely for failure to provide this documentation in advance.

Parents shall provide a doctor’s letter or prescription notifying the school and the school bus service provider of their child’s allergy and the need to administer epinephrine in an allergic emergency.

No school teacher, school administrator, or school healthcare personnel, school bus driver, school bus monitor, or any other school personnel shall be liable for civil damages which may result from acts or omissions in use of the epinephrine which may constitute ordinary negligence; nor shall the school personnel mentioned in this subsection be liable for civil damages which may result from acts or omissions in the use of prescription inhalers by children which may constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton conduct. For the purposes of determining immunity from liability under subsection (d) only, the term “other school personnel” shall include any private entity providing school bus services and individual school bus drivers and monitors employed or otherwise engaged by such school bus service entities.

School physicians may execute standing orders and prescriptions for school nurses to use epinephrine when there are symptoms of anaphylaxis. The school department may permit each school within their jurisdiction to maintain epinephrine in cartridge injections for the purpose of emergency first aid to students who experience allergic reactions. The department’s policies, rules, and regulations shall also include the conditions and procedures for the storage and administration of epinephrine for the purpose of emergency first aid to students who experience allergic reactions.

The student’s parent or guardian is responsible for supplying and replacing, when necessary, all prescription medication that is authorized pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 324, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 108, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 146, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 140, § 1.

16-21-23.
School safety teams, school crisis response teams, and school safety assessments.

Each school district of each town, city, and regional school department shall conduct a school safety assessment in conjunction with local police, fire, school safety team pursuant to the provisions of this section and any other expert said school department deems necessary. The assessment shall examine the current status of each school building’s safety and shall be performed within thirty (30) days of passage of this act, and every three (3) years thereafter.

There shall be a Rhode Island school safety committee whose functions shall include, but not be limited to, providing training to law enforcement, school administrators, and teachers; collecting and reviewing all hazard safety security assessments; and offering recommendations and assistance to each school district of every town, city, and regional school department, in an effort to increase the safety of students and faculty. The committee shall be comprised of twelve (12) members as follows: the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police or designee, who shall serve as chairperson of the committee; the president of the Police Chiefs’ Association, or designee; the director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency, or designee; the commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary education, or designee; a representative from the Rhode Island School Superintendents’ Association, to be selected by the association; the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or designee; the state fire marshal, or designee; a representative of the Rhode Island Association of School Maintenance Directors, to be selected by the association; a representative from the Rhode Island Association of School Principals, to be selected by the association; a representative from the Rhode Island Association of School Committees, to be selected by the association; a representative from the National Education Association of Rhode Island (“NEARI”), who shall be a full-time classroom teacher, to be selected by the president of NEARI; and one representative from the Rhode Island Federation of Teachers and Health Professionals (“RIFTHP”), who shall be a full-time classroom teacher, to be selected by the president of the RIFTHP.

Each school department of each town, city, and regional school district shall complete the emergency action plan and shall submit the all hazards site safety survey report to the Rhode Island school safety committee every three (3) years for the committee’s review and recommendation.

The assessment shall be completed by November 1 of the year mandated, and by December 31 of that year, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall report to the speaker of the house, the senate president, and the governor that the assessments have been completed. Assessments performed within a year of the date of passage of this act shall satisfy this requirement.

All meetings regarding the school safety assessment are not subject to the open meetings law pursuant to chapter 46 of title 42, and documents produced including, but not limited to, meeting minutes and the school safety assessment are not subject to the access to public records law pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38.

The school committee of each town, city, and regional school department shall review and adopt in executive session a comprehensive school safety plan regarding crisis intervention, emergency response, and management. The plan shall be developed by a school safety team comprised of representatives of the school committee; representatives of student, teacher, and parent organizations; school safety personnel; school administration; and members of local law enforcement, fire, and emergency personnel. Members of the school safety team shall be appointed by the school committee and/or school superintendent of the town, city, or regional school district. In creating the school safety plan, the school safety team(s) shall consult the model school safety plan developed by the department of elementary and secondary education pursuant to §

16-21-23.1

.

The school crisis response team shall be comprised of those selected school personnel willing to serve as members of a psychological response team to address the psychological and emotional needs of the school community, and may seek mental health resources from the department of elementary and secondary education. Members of the school crisis response team may coordinate mental health services for those students and school employees affected by acts of violence in the schools, using resources available through the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 10, § 1.

16-21-23.1.
Model school safety plans and checklists — Development and dissemination.

It shall be the duty of the department of elementary and secondary education to collaborate with the Rhode Island emergency management agency, state police, state fire marshal, the department of behavioral health, developmental disabilities, and hospitals, and other safety officials to develop a model school safety plan to be consulted by school safety teams in accordance with §

16-21-23

. This model plan shall be based on best practices in school safety planning and the department of elementary and secondary education shall communicate the plan electronically to all school committees and school safety teams in the state.

It shall be the duty of the department of elementary and secondary education to develop and disseminate school safety check lists that school districts can use on a regular basis and at least annually to assess the strengths and weaknesses of school safety in accordance with §

16-21-24

. The check lists shall incorporate best practices in school safety planning and the department of elementary and secondary education shall communicate the plan electronically to all school committees and school safety teams in the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 151, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 211, § 2.

16-21-23.2.
Threat assessment teams and oversight committees.

Each local school board or committee shall adopt written policies for the establishment of threat assessment teams, including the assessment of and intervention with individuals whose behavior may pose a threat to the safety of school staff or students consistent with the model policies developed by the school safety committee. The policies shall include procedures for referrals to community services or healthcare providers for evaluation or treatment when appropriate.

The superintendent of each school district shall establish a district committee charged with oversight of the threat assessment teams operating within the district, which may be an existing committee established by the district. The committee shall include individuals with expertise in guidance, counseling, school administration, mental health, and law enforcement.

Each district superintendent shall establish, for each school, a threat assessment team that shall include persons with expertise in guidance, counseling, school administration, mental health, and law enforcement. Threat assessment teams may be established to serve schools as determined by the district superintendent. Each team shall:

Provide guidance to students, faculty, and staff regarding recognition of threatening or aberrant behavior that may represent a threat to the community, school, or self;

Identify members of the school community to whom threatening behavior should be reported; and

Implement policies adopted by the local school board or committee pursuant to subsection (a).

Upon preliminary determination that a student poses a threat of violence or physical harm to self or others, a threat assessment team shall immediately report its determination to the district superintendent or designee. The building administrator or designee may, if appropriate, attempt to notify the student’s parent or legal guardian. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude school district personnel from acting immediately to address an imminent threat.

No member of a threat assessment team shall disclose any information obtained pursuant to this section or otherwise use any record of an individual beyond the purpose for which the disclosure was made to the threat assessment team.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 260, § 1.

16-21-24.
Requirements of school safety plans, school emergency response plans, and school crisis response plans.

School safety plans, as required by this chapter, shall address, but not to be limited to, prevention, mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery. The school safety plans shall include, at a minimum, the following policies and procedures:

Appropriate prevention, mitigation, preparedness and intervention strategies which are based on data to target priority needs and which make use of effective actions based on currently accepted best practices and once developed, the appropriate parts of the state model plan pursuant to general laws §

16-21-23.1

that include consistent, plain language and terminology;

Formalized collaborative arrangements with state and local law enforcement and fire fighter officials, designed to ensure that school safety officers and other security personnel are adequately trained, including being trained to de-escalate potentially violent situations, and are effectively and fairly recruited;

Policies and procedures relating to school building security, including where appropriate the use of school safety officers and/or security devices or procedures;

Policies and procedures for annual school safety training and a review of the school crisis response plan for staff and students;

Protocols for school personnel and students responding to bomb threats, hostage-takings, intrusions, and kidnappings that include consistent, plain language and terminology that is recommended by the model plan pursuant to general laws §

16-21-23.1

;

Policies and procedures for responding to violence by students, teachers, other school personnel as well as visitors to the school that include consistent, plain language and terminology that is recommended by the model plan pursuant to general laws § 16-21-23.1;

Policies and procedures for responding to acts of violence by students, teachers, other school personnel and visitors to the school that include consistent, plain language and terminology that is recommended by the model plan pursuant to general laws § 16-21-23.1;

Policies and procedures for contacting appropriate law enforcement officials and EMS/Fire, in the event of a violent incident and that include consistent, plain language and terminology that is recommended by the model plan pursuant to general laws § 16-21-23.1;

Policies and procedures for notification and activation of the school crisis response team that include consistent, plain language and terminology that is recommended by the model plan pursuant to general laws § 16-21-23.1;

Policies and procedures for contacting parents, guardians, or persons in parental relation to the students of the city, town, or region in the event of a violent incident;

Policies and procedures for the dissemination of informative materials regarding the early detection of potentially violent behaviors, including, but not limited to, the identification of family, community, and environmental factors, to teachers, administrators, school personnel, persons in parental relation to students of the city, town, or region students and other persons deemed appropriate to receive that information;

Strategies for improving communication, including use of common, consistent plain language by school district officials, school officials and emergency responders, among students and between students and staff and reporting of potentially violent incidents, such as the establishment of youth-run programs, peer mediation, conflict resolution, creating a forum or designating a mentor for students concerned with bullying or violence, and establishing anonymous reporting mechanisms for school violence;

A description of the duties of hall monitors and any other school safety personnel, including the school crisis response team, and the training requirements of all personnel acting in a school security capacity and policies and procedures for students, personnel who are in the hallway during a lockdown situation that include consistent language and terminology that is recommended by the department of elementary and secondary education;

Policies and procedures for providing notice of threats of violence or harm to the student or school employee who is the subject of the threat. The policy shall define “threats of violence or harm” to include violent actions and threats of violent actions either individually or by groups, but shall not include conduct or comments that a reasonable person would not seriously consider to be a legitimate threat;

Policies and procedures for disclosing information that is provided to the school administrators about a student’s conduct, including, but not limited to, the student’s prior disciplinary records, and history of violence, to classroom teachers, school staff, and school security, if they have been determined by the principal to have a legitimate need for the information in order to fulfill their professional responsibilities and for protecting such information from any further disclosure; and

Procedures for determining whether or not any threats or conduct established in the policy may be grounds for discipline of the student. School districts, school committees, school officials, and school employees providing notice in good faith as required and consistent with the committee’s policies adopted under this section are immune from any liability arising out of such notification.

School safety plans, as required by this chapter, shall further include school emergency response plans specific to each school building contained within each city, town, or regional school district, and shall be developed and approved in consultation with local police and fire. The state police shall provide consultation for those school districts that for whatever reason may not have access to local police. School emergency response plans shall include, and address, but not be limited to, the following elements:

Policies and procedures for the safe evacuation of students, teachers, and other school personnel as well as visitors to the school in the event of a serious violent incident or other emergency, which shall include evacuation routes and shelter sites and procedures for addressing medical needs, transportation, and emergency notification to persons in parental relation to a student. For purposes of this subdivision, “serious violent incident” means an incident of violent criminal conduct that is, or appears to be, life threatening and warrants the evacuation of students and/or staff;

Designation of an emergency response team comprised of school personnel, local law enforcement officials, and representatives from local regional and/or state emergency response agencies, other appropriate incident response teams including a school crisis response team, and a post-incident response team that includes appropriate school personnel, medical personnel, mental health counselors, and others who can assist the school community in coping with the aftermath of a violent incident;

Procedures for assuring that crisis response and law enforcement officials have access to floor plans, blueprints, schematics, or other maps of the school interior and school grounds, and road maps of the immediate surrounding area;

Establishment of internal and external communication systems in emergencies that include consistent, plain language and terminology that is recommended by the model plan established pursuant to general laws §

16-21-23.1

;

Definition and formalization of the chain of command in a manner consistent with the national interagency incident management system/incident command system;

Procedures for review and the conduct of drills and other exercises to test components of the emergency response plan, including use of checklists as described in §

16-21-23.1

;

Policies and procedures for securing and restricting access to the crime scene in order to preserve evidence in cases of violent crimes on school property; and

Policies and procedures for ensuring timely access to mental health services for those students and school employees affected by a violent incident.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 103, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 211, § 1.

16-21-25.
Review of school safety plans — Exemption from open meetings and public records requirements.

Each city, town, or regional department school safety plan and school emergency response plans shall be reviewed on an annual basis by the school committee and updated annually. These reviews and updates shall be completed by November 1 of any given year, and by December 31 of that year, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall report to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, and the governor that such reviews or updates have been completed.

All meetings of school safety teams shall not be subject to and be exempt from the open meetings law pursuant to chapter 46 of title 42, and documents produced by the school safety teams shall not be subject to the access to public records laws as set forth in chapter 2 of title 38.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 212, § 1.

16-21-26.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 204, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 213, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 220, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2011, ch. 162, § 4, and by P.L. 2011, ch. 178, § 4, effective June 30, 2011.

16-21-27.
Alternative education programs.

Each school district shall adopt a plan to ensure continued education of students who are removed from the classroom because of a suspension of more than ten (10) days or who are chronically truant. The plan shall be adopted by the school committee and shall be submitted to Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education as part of its annual strategic plan submission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 555, § 1.

16-21-28.
Health and wellness subcommittee.

The school committee of each school district shall establish a district-wide coordinated school health and wellness subcommittee chaired by a member of the full school committee. The subcommittee will make recommendations regarding the district’s health education curriculum and instruction, physical education curriculum and instruction, and nutrition and physical activity policies to decrease obesity and enhance the health and well being of students and employees.

The school health and wellness subcommittee shall consist of members of the general public, a majority of whom are not employed by the school district, including at least one parent, and are encouraged to include teachers; administrator; students; community and school-based health professionals; business community representatives; and representatives of local and statewide nonprofit health organizations. The subcommittee will be chaired by a member of the school committee.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the school committee from reconstituting any existing district-wide volunteer committees as the school health and wellness subcommittee so long as said committee membership meets the requirements of this section.

The school health and wellness subcommittee shall be responsible for, but not limited to, development of policies, strategies, and implementation plans that promote purchasing and serving locally grown fruits, vegetables and dairy products and that meet the requirements of the child nutrition and WIC Reauthorization Act of 2004. The school health and wellness subcommittee shall forward all recommendations regarding the district’s health education curriculum and instruction, physical education curriculum and instruction, nutrition policies, and physical activity policies to the full school committee.

Reporting shall be consistent with requirements of §

16-7.1-2(h)

.

The Rhode Island department of elementary and secondary education and the Rhode Island department of heath will provide technical assistance and support to the school health and wellness subcommittees on best practices, professional development on coordinated school health issues, suggested initiatives, and will support communication among the school health and wellness subcommittees by sharing information on the activities, efforts, and experiences of subcommittees across the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 74, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 76, § 3; P.L. 2013, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 398, § 1.

16-21-28.1.
Legislative findings.

Approximately one in five hundred (500) school children have diabetes. Individuals with diabetes need to manage their diabetes carefully to keep their blood glucose levels within target range.

High blood glucose levels contribute to medical complications, such as blindness, kidney failure, amputations and cardiovascular disease, while severely low blood glucose levels can lead to unconsciousness or seizures with a potential for brain damage or death.

While episodes of unconsciousness or seizures are uncommon, schools should be prepared to promptly respond to such emergencies due to the urgency of the situation, and the inability of the student to drink or ingest food that might restore their blood sugar level.

Across the country, schools are increasingly more prepared and trained for medical emergencies using defibrillators and giving injections to counter allergic reactions.

The American academy of pediatrics September 2003 policy guidelines on administration of medication in school states: “Some medications, such as epinephrine injections for severe allergic reactions or glucagons for hypoglycemia (low blood sugar), have few significant adverse effects. Because these episodes, by nature, occur at unpredictable times when a school nurse may not be available, trained designated school staffs should be available.”

The Rhode Island chapter of the American academy of pediatrics states (November 20, 2005) that: “While quite rare, such episodes (of hypoglycemic unconsciousness or seizure) run the risk of serious long-term complications, and potentially death, if there is a delay in appropriate treatment.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 243, § 1.

16-21-28.2.
Requirements for glucagon administration in a school setting.

The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of health shall incorporate into their policies, rules and regulations for addressing incidents of hypoglycemia resulting in unconsciousness, seizure and/or the inability to swallow in order to provide for the health and safety of children who have been medically identified as having diabetes. The policies, rules and regulations shall include procedures whereby:

A parent or legal guardian of any child may expressly authorize school employees or those employed on behalf of the school, for when there is no school nurse immediately available, to administer glucagon on such child in case of an emergency, while at school or school-sponsored activities;

The glucagon shall be kept in a conspicuous place, readily available; and

Glucagon administration training may be provided by a licensed physician, physician assistant, advanced practiced registered nurse, or registered nurse, however in no case shall school nurse teachers be required to provide training; and the school administration shall allow staff to voluntarily assist with the emergency administration of glucagon when authorized by a parent or legal guardian.

A school employee, including administrative staff, shall not be subject to penalty or disciplinary action for refusing to be trained in glucagon administration.

A parent or legal guardian shall provide a diabetes management plan or physician’s order, signed by the student’s health care provider, that prescribes the care and assistance needed by the student including glucagon administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 243, § 1.

16-21-28.3.
Performance standards.

The department of health, in conjunction with the American diabetes association, and the Rhode Island chapter of American academy of pediatrics, shall develop performance standards and guidelines for the training and supervision of personnel, other than the school nurse, who provide emergency medical assistance to students under this section. Such personnel shall only be authorized to provide such assistance upon successful completion of glucagon administration training.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 243, § 1.

16-21-28.4.
Immunity for those using glucagon.

No school teacher, school administrator, school health care personnel, person employed on behalf of the school, any other school personnel, nor any local educational authority shall be liable for civil damages which may result from acts or omissions in use of glucagon which may constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity does nor apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton conduct.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 243, § 1.

16-21-28.5.
Training of school personnel.

Training on the administration of epinephrine or glucagon for school personnel, or those employed on behalf of the school, shall not be considered the delegation of nursing practice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 243, § 1.

16-21-28.6.
Administration.

The administration of epinephrine or glucagon by school personnel, or those employed on behalf of the school, shall not be considered the practice of nursing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 243, § 1.

16-21-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 234, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 529, § 2, effective August 11, 2016.

16-21-30.
Dating violence policy.

As used in this section:

“At school” means in a classroom, on or immediately adjacent to school premises, on a school bus or other school-related vehicle, at an official school bus stop, or at any school-sponsored activity or event whether or not it is on school grounds.

“Dating partner” means any person, regardless of gender, involved in an intimate relationship with another primarily characterized by the expectation of affectionate involvement whether casual, serious, or long-term.

“Dating violence” means a pattern of abusive or coercive behaviors used to exert power and control over a current or former dating partner. Behaviors may occur online, in person, or through the use of technology. Abuse may be physical, verbal, emotional, sexual, financial, or psychological and includes threats, isolation, and intimidation.

The department of education shall develop a model dating violence policy to assist school districts in developing policies for dating violence reporting and response. The model policy shall be issued on or before April 1, 2008.

Each school district shall establish a specific policy to address incidents of dating violence involving students at school by December 1, 2008. Each school district shall verify compliance with the department of education on an annual basis through the annual school health report.

The policy shall include, but not be limited to: a statement that dating violence will not be tolerated; dating violence reporting procedures; guidelines to responding to at school incidents of dating violence; and discipline procedures specific to the incidents.

To ensure notice of the school district’s dating violence policy, the policy shall be published in any school district policy and handbook that sets forth the comprehensive rules, procedures, and standards of conduct for students at school.

Each school district shall provide dating violence training to all administrators, teachers, nurses, and mental health staff at the middle and high school levels. Upon the recommendation of the administrator, other staff may be included or may attend the training on a volunteer basis. The dating violence training shall include, but not be limited to: basic principles of dating violence; warnings signs of dating violence; and the school district’s dating violence policy, to ensure that they are able to appropriately respond to incidents of dating violence at school. Thereafter, this training shall be provided yearly to all newly hired staff deemed appropriate to receive the training by the school’s administration.

Each school district shall inform the students’ parents or legal guardians of the school district’s dating violence policy. If requested, the school district shall provide the parents or legal guardians with the school district’s dating violence policy and relevant information. It is strongly recommended that the school district provide parent awareness training.

Each school district shall collect data regarding instances of student misconduct that are considered dating violence. As part of the usual course of discipline data submission to the department of education, each school district shall specify when a particular infraction is also considered dating violence.

This section does not prevent a victim from seeking redress under any other available law, either civil or criminal. This section does not create or alter any tort liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 287, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 490, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 319, § 1, effective July 9, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 320, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

16-21-31.
Notice of peanut/tree nut allergies — Posting.

In any school subject to the provisions of this chapter wherein a student with an allergy to peanuts/tree nuts and/or food derived from peanut/tree nuts products is in attendance, a notice shall be posted within that school building in a conspicuous place at every point of entry and within the cafeteria facility advising that there are students at said school with allergies to peanuts/tree nuts. The notice shall not identify the individual(s) with such allergy.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 90, § 1.

16-21-32.
Peanut/tree nut allergies.

The governing body of each elementary, middle or junior high school approved for the purpose of §§

16-19-1

and

16-19-2

, shall develop a policy designed to provide a safe environment for students with peanut/tree nut allergies. When a school is aware that an enrolled student has a peanut/tree nut allergy with potentially serious health consequences, the school shall implement a protocol, consistent with the governing body’s policy, that provides the student with protections while he or she is attending school or participating in school-sponsored activities. The governing body’s policy shall include the development of an individual health care plan (IHCP) and an emergency health care plan (EHCP) for each student with such food allergy. The student’s IHCP and EHCP shall be developed collaboratively and be signed by the school nurse, the student’s health care provider, the parents/guardians of the student, and the student (if appropriate). Depending upon the nature and extent of the student’s peanut/tree nut allergy, the measures listed in the IHCP may include the posting of signs at school, the prohibition of the sale of particular food items in the school, the designation of special tables in the cafeteria, the prohibition of particular food items in certain classrooms, and the complete prohibition of particular food items from a school or school grounds.

The department of elementary and secondary education and the department of health shall amend their rules and regulations for school health programs to establish standards for the care of students with peanut/tree nut allergies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 86, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 90, § 2.